Washington statutes.
RCW 43.46.090

Commission as reflecting state's responsibility—Acquisition of works of art for public buildings and lands—Visual arts program established.

The legislature recognizes this state's responsibility to foster culture and the arts and its interest in the viable development of the state's artists by the establishment of the Washington state arts commission. The legislature declares it to be a policy of this state that a portion of appropriations for capital expenditures be set aside for the acquisition of works of art to be placed in public buildings or lands. There is hereby established a visual arts program to be administered by the Washington state arts commission.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5134; 1983 c 204 s 1; 1974 ex.s. c 176 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 204: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1983 c 204 s 11.]

Allocation of moneys for acquisition of works of art—Expenditure by arts commission—Conditions: RCW 43.17.200.

Colleges and universities, purchases of works of art—Procedure: RCW 28B.10.025.

Purchase of works of art—Procedure: RCW 43.19.455.

School districts, purchases of works of art—Procedure: RCW 28A.335.210.